Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6210.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. Beginning 6 months after the effective date of this act, a person shall September 30, 1983, an individual must not be a state correctional officer unless he or she the individual is certified or recertified by the Michigan commission of corrections department as provided in section 10, 11, or 12. The Michigan commission of corrections department shall certify those persons and annually recertify on an annual basis those persons individuals who satisfy meet both of the following: (a) Satisfy the criteria set forth in under sections 10 to 12. (b) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subdivision, were not previously employed by any of the following agencies between September 1, 2025 and January 20, 2029: (i) The United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement. (ii) The United States Customs and Border Protection. (iii) The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.